Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 2

Contraction

6-51-201. Procedure — Ordinance — Referendum.

Any incorporated city or town, whether it was incorporated by general or special act, may contract its limits within any given territory; provided, that three fourths (¾) of the qualified voters voting in an election thereon assent thereto.

Any incorporated city or town, whether it was incorporated by general or special act, may after notice and public hearing, contract its limits within any given territory upon its own initiative by ordinance when it appears in the best interest of the affected territory.

Such contraction of limits within any territory shall not occur unless a majority of the total membership of the city legislative body approves such contraction.

Such contraction of limits within any territory shall not occur if opposed by a majority of the voters residing within the area to be deannexed. The concurrence of a majority of the voters shall be presumed unless a petition objecting to deannexation signed by ten percent (10%) of the registered voters residing within the area proposed to be deannexed is filed with the city recorder within seventy-five (75) days following the final reading of the contraction ordinance. If such a petition is filed, a referendum shall be held at the next general election to ascertain the will of the voters residing in the area that the city proposes to deannex. The ballot shall provide a place where voters may vote for or against deannexation by the city. If a majority of those voting in the referendum fail to vote for the deannexation, the contraction ordinance shall be void and the matter may not be considered again for two (2) years. If a majority vote for deannexation, the ordinance shall become effective upon certification of the result of the referendum.

Acts 1875, ch. 92, § 15; Shan., § 1911; mod. Code 1932, § 3322; Acts 1955, ch. 61, § 1; 1955, ch. 113, § 10; 1979, ch. 363, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-304; Acts 1984, ch. 731, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Consolidation of County and City Functions and Other Devices for Simplifying Tennessee Local Government (Wallace Mendelson), 8 Vand. L. Rev. 878 (1954).

Attorney General Opinions. Electronic signatures on petitions for municipal formation and annexation. OAG 12-80, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 76 (8/2/12).

Referendum on deannexation. OAG 13-45, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (6/11/13).

6-51-202. Election.

The election provided for in § 6-51-201, shall be held under an ordinance to be passed for that purpose. A full report of the election shall be spread upon the minutes of the board, if three fourths (¾) of the voters assent to the contraction, and in the report the metes and bounds of the territory to be excluded must be fully set forth.

Acts 1875, ch. 92, § 15; Shan., § 1912; Code 1932, § 3323; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-305.

6-51-203. Recording of deannexation ordinance by contracting municipality.

Upon approving deannexation by ordinance in accordance with § 6-51-201, a contracting municipality shall record the ordinance with the register of deeds in the county or counties where the deannexation was adopted or approved. The ordinance must include a detailed description of the deannexed territory, including, but not limited to, map and parcel numbers of all real property within the deannexed territory. A copy of the ordinance, map, and detailed description must also be sent to the comptroller of the treasury and the assessor of property for each county affected by the deannexation.

Acts 2019, ch. 120, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 6-51-203 (Acts 1875, ch. 92, § 15; Shan., § 1913; Code 1932, § 3324; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-306), concerning transcripts of contraction proceedings, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 700, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 120, § 3. April 9, 2019.

6-51-204. Effective date of contraction — Continuing jurisdiction for taxation — Notice of contraction.

Except for responsibility for any debt contracted prior to the surrender of jurisdiction, all municipal jurisdiction shall cease over the territory excluded from the municipality's corporate limits on the effective date of the ordinance if the contraction is done by ordinance, or on the date of the certification of the results of the election if the contraction is done by election. The municipality may continue to levy and collect taxes on property in the excluded territory to pay the excluded territory's proportion of any debt contracted prior to the exclusion.

The chief executive officer of the municipality shall notify the county assessor of property as to contractions in the territorial limits of the municipality and shall provide the county assessor of property with a complete description of all property affected by the contractions.

Acts 1875, ch. 92, § 15; Shan., § 1914; Code 1932, § 3325; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-307; Acts 1986, ch. 700, § 2; 2008, ch. 971, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1 provided that the code commission is directed to change all references to “tax assessor”, wherever such references appear, to “assessor of property”, as such sections are amended or volumes are replaced. See § 1-1-116.